Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.068

Quality assurance—Interagency cooperation.

The department of health, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, the office of the insurance commissioner, and the department of labor and industries shall form an interagency group for coordination and consultation on quality assurance activities and collaboration on final recommendations for the study required under RCW 43.70.066.

[ 1997 c 274 s 4; 1995 c 267 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1997 c 274: See note following RCW 41.05.021.

Captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—1995 c 267: See notes following RCW 43.70.052.